Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-3406
Agents and employees.

A land bank may employ such agents and employees, permanent or temporary, as it may require, and may determine the qualifications and fix the compensation and benefits of such persons.

Laws 2013, LB97, § 6;

R.S.Supp.,2018, § 19-5206;

Laws 2020, LB424, § 6.